District of Columbia statutes.
44-733

Asbestos abatement — Rules and regulations.

The Mayor is authorized to issue rules and regulations, in accordance with recommendations of the Task Force, to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-173, § 4, 32 DCR 736

History

1981 Ed., § 32-119.3.

Prior Codifications